Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202053-123
Licenses; types.

Licenses issued by the commission shall be of the following types: (1) Manufacturer's license; (2) alcoholic liquor wholesale license, except beer; (3) beer wholesale license; (4) retail license; (5) railroad license; (6) airline license; (7) boat license; (8) nonbeverage user's license; (9) farm winery license; (10) craft brewery license; (11) shipping license; (12) special designated license; (13) catering license; (14) microdistillery license; (15) entertainment district license; (16) pedal-pub vehicle license; (17) bottle club license; and (18) special party bus license.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 25, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-325;

R.S.1943, § 53-123;

Laws 1947, c. 187, § 1, p. 616;

Laws 1947, c. 188, § 1, p. 621;

Laws 1963, c. 310, § 3, p. 926;

Laws 1967, c. 332, § 3, p. 881;

Laws 1985, LB 279, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 750, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1130, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB734, § 5.

A nonprofit corporation license is a retail license for the sale of alcoholic liquors including beer. Arrow Club, Inc. v. Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, 177 Neb. 686, 131 N.W.2d 134 (1964).

Where statute authorizes granting licensees right to sell all forms of alcoholic liquors including beer, licensees are entitled to sell beer and other liquor in same room, notwithstanding another section declaring public policy in favor of separate sale. Hanson v. Gass, 130 Neb. 685, 267 N.W. 403 (1936).